Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.096

Destruction of animals—Payment of indemnity.

In ordering the slaughter or destruction of any animal, the director may pay an indemnity in an amount not to exceed seventy-five percent of the appraised or salvage value of the animal ordered slaughtered or destroyed. The actual indemnity amount shall be established by the director by rule. Payment of indemnity does not apply to an animal: (1) Belonging to the federal government or any of its agencies, this state or any of its agencies, or any municipal corporation; or (2) that has been brought into this state in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 8 s 10; 1985 c 415 s 4; 1963 ex.s. c 8 s 1.]